New Mexico, session 2026, HB292.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. A new section of the Corrections Department Act is enacted to read: "[NEW MATERIAL] ZERO-TOLERANCE SEXUAL ABUSE AND VIOLENCE POLICY--RULES.-- A. The corrections department shall adopt a zero-tolerance policy for sexual abuse and violence in all incarceration facilities. B. The corrections department shall, no later than October 21, 2026, promulgate rules to prevent the occurrence of sexual abuse or violence in all incarceration facilities, including: (1) best practices; (2) sexual abuse or violence services; (3) reporting requirements for any instances of sexual abuse or violence; (4) data collection regarding instances of sexual abuse or violence; (5) best practices to prevent incidents of sexual abuse or violence against lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender and queer inmates; (6) resources, including counseling and health care services, for inmates or guards who have experienced sexual violence or abuse; (7) training for staff to minimize the occurrences of sexual violence; and (8) training for staff to receive reports of sexual violence." - 2 -